ro-RO: Material pentru bilele de abac: Spumă; Metal; Materiale mixte; Plastic; Cauciuc; Silicon; Lemn; Altele
pt-BR: Material para contas de ábaco: Espuma; Metal; Materiais mistos; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Madeira; Outros
el: Υλικό χάντρας άβακα: Αφρώδες υλικό; Μέταλλο; Μικτά υλικά; Πλαστικό; Καουτσούκ; Σιλικόνη; Ξύλο; Άλλο
fi: Abacus-helmimateriaali: Vaahtomuovi; Metalli; Sekamateriaalit; Muovi; Kumi; Silikoni; Puu; Muu
pl: Materiał na koraliki abakusa: Pianka; Metal; Materiały mieszane; Tworzywo sztuczne; Guma; Silikon; Drewno; Inne
es: Material de cuentas de ábaco: Espuma; Metal; Materiales mixtos; Plástico; Goma; Silicona; Madera; Otro
nl: Abacus kralenmateriaal: Schuim; Metaal; Gemengde materialen; Plastic; Rubber; Siliconen; Hout; Overig
sk-SK: Materiál korálikov počítadla: Pena; Kov; Zmiešané materiály; Plast; Guma; Silikón; Drevo; Iné
vi: Vật liệu hạt bàn tính: Mút xốp; Kim loại; Vật liệu hỗn hợp; Nhựa; Cao su; Silicon; Gỗ; Khác
lt-LT: Abako karoliukų medžiaga: Porolonas; Metalas; Mišrios medžiagos; Plastikas; Guma; Silikonas; Mediena; Kita
fr: Matériau des perles de boulier: Mousse; Métal; Matériaux mixtes; Plastique; Caoutchouc; Silicone; Bois; Autre
th: วัสดุลูกปัดลายลูกคิด: โฟม; โลหะ; วัสดุผสม; พลาสติก; ยาง; ซิลิโคน; ไม้; อื่นๆ
ru: Материал костяшек счетов: Пеноматериал; Металл; Смешанные материалы; Пластик; Резина; Силикон; Дерево; Другое
sv: Abacus pärlmaterial: Skum; Metall; Blandade material; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Trä; Övrigt
ja: そろばん玉の材料: フォーム; 金属; 混合素材; プラスチック; ゴム; シリコン; 木材; その他
pt-PT: Materiais das contas do ábaco: Espuma; Metal; Materiais mistos; Plástico; Borracha; Silicone; Madeira; Outro
sl-SI: Material kroglic za abakus: Pena; Kovina; Mešani materiali; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Les; Drugo
de: Abakusperlenmaterial: Schaumstoff; Metall; Gemischte Materialien; Kunststoff; Gummi; Silikon; Holz; Andere
zh-TW: 算盤珠材質: 泡棉; 金屬; 混合材質; 塑膠; 橡膠; 矽膠; 木材; 其他
ko: 주판알 재질: 폼; 금속; 혼합 소재; 플라스틱; 고무; 실리콘; 목재; 기타
it: Materiale per perline dell'abaco: Schiuma; Metallo; Materiali misti; Plastica; Gomma; Silicone; Legno; Altro
zh-CN: 算珠材质: 泡沫塑料; 金属; 混合材质; 塑料; 橡胶; 硅胶; 木材; 其他
hu: Abacus gyöngy anyaga: Habszivacs; Fém; Vegyes anyagok; Műanyag; Gumi; Szilikon; Fa; Egyéb
tr: Abaküs boncuk malzemesi: Köpük; Metal; Karışık materyaller; Plastik; Kauçuk; Silikon; Ahşap; Diğer
hr-HR: Materijal za perle abakusa: Pjena; Metal; Miješani materijali; Plastika; Guma; Silikon; Drvo; Ostalo
nb: Materiale i kuler i kuleramme: Skum; Metall; Blandede materialer; Plast; Gummi; Silikon; Tre; Annet
da: Abacus-perlemateriale: Skum; Metal; Blandede materialer; Plast; Gummi; Silikone; Træ; Andet
cs: Materiál korálků počítadla: Pěna; Kov; Kombinované materiály; Plast; Guma; Silikon; Dřevo; Ostatní
bg-BG: Материал за мъниста за абак: Пяна; Метал; Смесени материали; Пластмаса; Гума; Силикон; Дърво; Други
en: Abacus bead material: Foam; Metal; Mixed materials; Plastic; Rubber; Silicone; Wood; Other